src/ateq-kal-morph.txt
LEXICON Z1ateq+qaZ
+N+Prop+Attr: # ; !Z1ateqSZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutiga	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaa	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutini	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCuterput	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtarput	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutersi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtarsi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaat	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaat	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutertik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtartik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqap	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutima	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutivit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimi	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitta	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatta	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaata	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqamut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqamit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqamiit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaaniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminiit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaanniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqami	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaani	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimini	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinni	LokVb ;
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanni	LokVb ;
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaanni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqatut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqatuut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimisut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaattut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaattut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqamik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCtassinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%CVCTRUNCqqakkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaagut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
